Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3602
Intent and purpose
of act.

It is
declared to be the public policy of the State of Nebraska to protect and foster
the health, prosperity, and general welfare of its people by protecting and
stabilizing the corn industry and the economy of the areas producing corn.
The Corn Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board shall be the agency
of the State of Nebraska for such purpose. In connection with and in furtherance
of such purpose, it is declared to be in the interest of the public
welfare of the state that the producers of corn be permitted and encouraged
to develop, carry out, and participate in programs of research, education,
market development, and promotion. It is the purpose of the Nebraska Corn Resources Act to provide the
authorization and to prescribe the necessary procedures whereby corn producers
in this state may finance programs to achieve the activities expressed in the act.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1057, § 1.